District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.13

Regulation of public vehicles-for-hire.

(a)

The Commission may issue any reasonable rule relating to the supervision of public vehicles-for-hire it considers necessary for the protection of the public.

(b)

The Commission may establish standards, criteria, and requirements for the licensing of the different classes of public vehicles-for-hire and the owner and operators thereof, and may establish appropriate classes of license fees for the ownership and operation of public vehicles-for-hire subject to the requirements of this section, provided that no license requirement for operating authority shall be mandated by the Commission which is duplicative of the jurisdiction of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission.

(c)

No person, corporation, partnership, or association shall operate a public vehicle-for-hire in the District without first having procured all applicable licenses and meeting all requirements as mandated by the Commission. Any violation of this subsection shall subject a violator to a civil fine not to exceed $500.

(c-1)

Repealed.

(d)

The Commission may establish reasonable civil fines and penalties for violation of any rule issued pursuant to the authority of this section.

(e)

All rules and regulations applicable to public vehicles-for-hire in effect before October 22, 2012, that are consistent with this subchapter shall remain effective until amended or repealed by the Commission.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 14, 33 DCR 703
Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-280, § 2(a), 55 DCR 11066
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 6053, 57 DCR 181
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(n), 59 DCR 9431

History

1981 Ed., § 40-1713.
2001 Ed., § 50-313.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 17-280 added subsec. (c-1).
D.C. Law 18-111 repealed subsec. (c-1).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184 substituted “Commission” for “Mayor” and substituted “public vehicles-for-hire” for “passenger vehicles for hire” throughout the section; substituted “fines and penalties” for “fines” in (d); rewrote (e); and made stylistic changes.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 2(a) of Taxicab Company, Association, and Fleet and Limousine License Moratorium Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-490, August 4, 2008, 55 DCR 9162).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Taxicab Company, Association, and Fleet and Limousine License Moratorium Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-548, October 24, 2008, 55 DCR 11979).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6053 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6053 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For addition (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 6-97, § 14a, concerning interim requirements for ride-sharing services, see § 3(b) of the Livery Class Regulation and Ride-Sharing Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-169, September 27, 2013, 60 DCR 14736).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Emergency Legislation

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Short Title

Editor's Notes

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.